District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

10-1012.01

Master Public Facilities Plan.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1806g-1
as added July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-201, § 3, 57 DCR 4742
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 1032(a), 58 DCR 6226

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 1012(a) of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).

Editor's Notes

Section 4 of D.C. Law 18-201 provided that section 3 shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.

The Budget Director of the Council of the District of Columbia has determined, as of February 15, 2012, that the fiscal effect of section 3 of Law 18-201 has not been included in an approved budget and financial plan. Therefore, the provisions of this section, enacted by section 3 of Law 18-201, are not in effect.